Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1413.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7507.1(a)(2) and (e) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 7507.1. Invasion of privacy.(a) Offense defined.--Except as set forth in subsection (d), a person commits the offense of invasion of privacy if he, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any person, knowingly does any of the following:* * *(2) Photographs, videotapes, electronically depicts, films, generates or produces a visual depiction utilizing artificial intelligence or otherwise records or personally views the intimate parts, whether or not covered by clothing, of another person without that person's knowledge and consent 123456789101112131415161718 and which intimate parts that person does not intend to be visible by normal public observation.* * *(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Artificial intelligence." As defined in section 3131(g) (relating to unlawful dissemination of intimate image)."Full or partial nudity." Display of all or any part of the human genitals or pubic area or buttocks, or any part of the nipple of the breast of any female person, with less than a fully opaque covering."Intimate part." Any part of:(1) the human genitals, pubic area or buttocks; and(2) the nipple of a female breast."Photographs" or "films." Making any photograph, motion picture film, videotape or any other recording or transmission of the image of a person."Place where a person would have a reasonable expectation of privacy." A location where a reasonable person would believe that he could disrobe in privacy without being concerned that his undressing was being viewed, photographed or filmed by another."Views." Looking upon another person with the unaided eye or with any device designed or intended to improve visual acuity.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1413PN1872 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526